Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2205
Shareholder, defined.

For purposes of sections 44-2201 to 44-2221, shareholder shall mean a person owning, directly or indirectly, whether through another person or a holding company, beneficial interest, including such interest of any member of his or her immediate family, of more than ten percent of the outstanding equity securities of the applicant.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 5, p. 1262;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 194.